Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 9. Uniform Legislation

§ 201.
Commission; appointment; term; vacancy.

The Commission heretofore created for the promotion of uniformity of legislation shall consist of four lawyers, to be appointed by the Governor, each of whom shall serve for the term of five years commencing on the first day of February following his or her appointment.
In the month of January, the Governor shall appoint one commissioner to succeed the commissioner whose term so expires.
A vacancy in such office shall be filled by the Governor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 24, 1969.

§ 202.
Duties; meetings.

The Commission shall examine the subjects of civil marriage and divorce, insolvency, the form of notarial certificates, the descent and distribution of property, the acknowledgment of deeds, the execution and probate of wills, the law of incorporation of business corporations, and other subjects upon which uniformity is desired, and shall confer with the commissioners appointed for the same purpose by other states in drafting uniform laws to be submitted for approval and adoption by the several states.
It shall meet annually with the Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws for the promotion of uniformity of legislation in the United States and join with it in such measures as may be deemed by such Commission expedient to advance the object of such conference.

§ 203.
Repealed. 2009, No. 33, § 83(a).

§ 204.
Expenses and funding.

The members of the Commission shall receive necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Funding to support activities of the Commission shall be provided by the Legislature.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 126

, § 1;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

1997, No. 61

, § 46.

§ 205.
Standing committees; administrative rulemaking delegation.

Whenever a standing committee introduces or amends proposed legislation which delegates rulemaking authority to a State agency, the committee shall express in the legislation and, to the greatest extent possible, the intent of the legislation and the scope of the rulemaking authority being delegated. For all such proposed legislation, the committee shall make a determination, and express such determination in the legislation, as to whether such rulemaking delegation contemplates the adoption of routine technical rules or major substantive rules.

For the purposes of this section:

“Major substantive rules” means rules that require the exercise of significant agency discretion or interpretation in drafting, or, because of their subject matter or anticipated impact, are reasonably expected to result in a significant increase in the cost of doing business, a significant reduction in property values, the loss or significant reduction of government benefits or services, the imposition of State mandates on units of local governments, or other serious burdens on the public or units of local government.

“Routine technical rules” means procedural rules that establish standards of practice or procedure for the conduct of business with or before an agency, and any other rules that are not major substantive rules. Routine technical rules include forms prescribed by an agency, but do not include fees established by an agency, except fees established or amended by agency rule that are below a cap or within a range established by statute.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 54.